Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.074

Reflexology examination.

(1) Beginning July 1, 2013, applicants for the reflexology certification examination must demonstrate to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a)(i) Successful completion of a course of study in an approved reflexology program; or

(ii) Successful completion of an apprenticeship program approved by the secretary; and

(b) Be eighteen years of age or older.

(2) The secretary or his or her designee shall examine each reflexology applicant in a written examination determined most effective on subjects appropriate to the reflexology scope of practice. The subjects may include those that the secretary deems useful to test applicant's fitness to practice reflexology. Such examinations shall be limited in purpose to determining whether the applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice reflexology competently.

(3) All records of a reflexology candidate's performance shall be preserved for a period of not less than one year after the secretary has made and published decisions thereupon. All examinations shall be conducted under fair and impartial methods as determined by the secretary.

(4) A reflexology applicant who fails to make the required grade in the first examination is entitled to take up to two additional examinations upon the payment of a fee for each subsequent examination determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250. Upon failure of three examinations, the secretary may invalidate the original application and require such remedial education as is required by the secretary before admission to future examinations.

(5) The secretary may approve an examination prepared or administered, or both, by a private testing agency or association of licensing boards for use by a reflexology applicant in meeting the certification requirement.

[ 2012 c 137 s 12.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.